Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.090

Teacher shortage conditional scholarship program.

(1) The teacher shortage conditional scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to provide financial aid to encourage persons to become teachers and to retain these teachers in shortage areas.

(2) To qualify for the program an applicant must:

(a) Be accepted into, and maintain enrollment in, a Washington professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program leading to an initial teacher certificate; and

(b) Intend to pursue an initial teacher certificate with an endorsement in a shortage area.

(3) Participants are eligible to receive a teacher shortage conditional scholarship for up to four academic years.

[ 2019 c 295 s 216; 2016 c 233 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.